Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Congressional, Senatorial, and House of Delegates Districts.
§ 24.2-303.3.
Senate districts.

There shall be 40 members of the Senate of Virginia elected from 40 senate districts and each district is entitled to representation by one senator.

All references in this section to boundaries of counties and cities shall be interpreted to refer to those in existence on April 1, 2011, and as reported by the United States Bureau of the Census in the 2010 Census reports provided pursuant to United States Public Law 94-171, notwithstanding subsequent boundary changes by law, annexation, merger, consolidation, or the voiding of boundary changes theretofore made final.

Parts of counties and cities listed in subsection D are defined by reference to the 2010 Census reports for the precincts, parts of precincts, and blocks listed for each senate district in the Statistical Report on file with the Clerk of the House of Delegates for the Act of Assembly containing the final enactment of this section. Precincts shall be interpreted to refer to those in existence on April 1, 2011, and as reported by the United States Bureau of the Census in the 2010 Census reports provided pursuant to United States Public Law 94-171, notwithstanding subsequent changes made by localities.

The 40 senate districts are:First. All of the City of Williamsburg; part of James City County comprised of the Berkeley A Part 1 (101), Berkeley A Part 2 (1012), Powhatan B (302), Powhatan D (304), Roberts A Part 2 (5012), and Roberts C Part 2 (5032) Precincts and parts of the Jamestown B (202) and Roberts B (502) Precincts; part of York County comprised of the Magruder (104) and Queens Lake (101) Precincts; part of the City of Hampton comprised of the Kraft (208) and Tucker Capps (214) Precincts and part of the Forrest (204) Precinct; part of the City of Newport News comprised of the Bland (201), Boulevard (202), Carver (303), Charles (203), Deep Creek (205), Denbigh (101), Epes (102), Greenwood (110), Hidenwood (208), Hilton (209), Jenkins (103), Kiln Creek (218), Lee Hall (108), McIntosh (104), Nelson (210), Oyster Point (105), Palmer (211), Reservoir (106), Richneck (107), River (314), Riverside (212), Riverview (217), Sanford (213), Sedgefield (315), Warwick (215), Wellesley (204), Windsor (109), and Yates (216) Precincts and parts of the Deer Park (219), Downtown (305), Dunbar (306), and Watkins (320) Precincts; and part of the City of Suffolk comprised of the Harbour View (103) Precinct.Second. Part of York County comprised of the Bethel (502), Coventry (203), Edgehill (303), and Kiln Creek (204) Precincts; part of the City of Hampton comprised of the Aberdeen (101), Armstrong (106), Bassette (102), Bethel (212), Booker (201), Bryan (202), Burbank (203), City Hall (103), Cooper (104), East Hampton (105), Hampton Library (111), Jones (116), Kecoughtan (117), Langley (209), Lindsay (107), Machen (210), Mallory (118), Phenix (109), Phillips (213), Phoebus (110), Sandy Bottom (216), Smith (112), Syms (113), Thomas (108), Tyler (215), and Wythe (115) Precincts and part of the Forrest (204) Precinct; part of the City of Newport News comprised of the Briarfield (302), Chestnut (304), Huntington (307), Jefferson (308), Magruder (309), Marshall (310), Newmarket (311), Newsome Park (312), Reed (313), Saunders (319), South Morrison (316), Washington (317), and Wilson (318) Precincts and parts of the Deer Park (219), Downtown (305), Dunbar (306), and Watkins (320) Precincts; and part of the City of Portsmouth comprised of the Thirty-Seven (037) and Thirty-Nine (039) Precincts and part of the Thirty-Eight (038) Precinct.Third. All of Gloucester, King and Queen, King William, and New Kent Counties; all of the City of Poquoson; part of Isle of Wight County comprised of the Bartlett (201), Carrollton (202), Rushmere (301), and Smithfield (101) Precincts; part of James City County comprised of the Berkeley B Part 1 (1021), Berkeley B Part 2 (1022), Berkeley C (103), Jamestown A (201), Powhatan A (301), Powhatan C (303), Roberts A Part 1 (5011), Roberts C Part 1 (5031), Stonehouse A (401), Stonehouse B (402), and Stonehouse C (403) Precincts and parts of the Jamestown B (202) and Roberts B (502) Precincts; part of Surry County comprised of part of the Bacon’s Castle (201) Precinct; part of York County comprised of the Dare (402), Harris Grove (302), Harwoods Mill (401), Seaford (301), Tabb (501), Waller Mill (103), and Yorktown (102) Precincts; part of the City of Hampton comprised of the Asbury (205) Precinct; and part of the City of Suffolk comprised of the Driver (102) and Ebenezer (201) Precincts.Fourth. All of Caroline, Essex, Lancaster, Middlesex, Northumberland, and Richmond Counties; part of Hanover County comprised of the Ashcake (103), Atlee (304), Battlefield (401), Beaverdam (201), Beaverdam Creek (406), Black Creek (404), Blunts (202), Chickahominy (302), Clay (301), Cold Harbor (403), Cool Spring (305), Courthouse (206), Georgetown (506), Goddin’s Hill (204), Hanover Grove (604), Laurel Meadow (507), Mechanicsville (603), Newman (503), Old Church (402), Pebble Creek (405), Rural Point (502), Shady Grove (303), Sliding Hill (104), Stonewall Jackson (602), Studley (504), Totopotomoy (505), and Village (601) Precincts; part of King George County comprised of parts of the Courthouse (101) and Shiloh (401) Precincts; part of Spotsylvania County comprised of the Blaydes Corner (102), Lee Hill (403), Massaponax (104), Partlow (101), Summit (401), and Travelers Rest (103) Precincts; and part of Westmoreland County comprised of the Precinct

1-1

(101), Precinct

1-2

(102), and Precinct

2-1

(201) Precincts.Fifth. Part of the City of Chesapeake comprised of the B. M. Williams School (015), Camelot (003), Carver School (031), Crestwood (005), Fairways (053), Geneva Park (011), Georgetown (012), Gilmerton (013), Indian River (018), Johnson Park (026), Joliff Middle School (048), Norfolk Highlands (022), Oaklette (024), Oscar Smith School (010), Parkways (042), Providence (032), River Birch (040), River Walk (050), South Norfolk (030), South Norfolk Recreation (008), St. Julians (025), Tanglewood (029), and Westover (033) Precincts and parts of the Oak Grove (023) and Sunray II (045) Precincts; and part of the City of Norfolk comprised of the Ballentine (301), Berkley (402), Bowling Park (303), Brambleton (403), Campostella (404), Chesterfield (405), Coleman Place School (304), Easton (408), Fairlawn (409), Hunton Y (411), Ingleside (412), Lafayette (205), Lafayette-Winona (305), Lindenwood (306), Norview Methodist (308), Norview Middle School (309), Poplar Halls (413), Rosemont (310), Sherwood Rec Center (311), Sherwood School (312), Stuart (214), Tanner’s Creek (302), Union Chapel (313), United Way (415), and Young Park (414) Precincts and parts of the Ghent Square (203) and Willard (218) Precincts.Sixth. All of Accomack, Mathews, and Northampton Counties; part of the City of Norfolk comprised of the Barron Black (406), Bayview School (501), Chrysler Museum (211), Crossroads (511), East Ocean View (503), Granby (101), Immanuel (204), Lambert’s Point (207), Larchmont Library (208), Larchmont Recreation Center (209), Larrymore (504), Maury (210), Northside (103), Ocean View Center (506), Ocean View School (102), Oceanair (508), Old Dominion (201), Park Place (212), Suburban Park (215), Taylor Elementary School (213), Third Presbyterian (510), Titustown Center (104), Tucker House (105), Wesley (217), and Zion Grace (106) Precincts and parts of the Ghent Square (203), Tarrallton (509), and Willard (218) Precincts; and part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of part of the Chesapeake Beach (037) Precinct.Seventh. Part of the City of Norfolk comprised of the Azalea Gardens (512) and Little Creek (505) Precincts and part of the Tarrallton (509) Precinct; and part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of the Aragona (016), Arrowhead (023), Avalon (025), Baker (061), Bayside (020), Bonney (040), Brandon (042), Centerville (044), College Park (041), Colonial (065), Davis Corner (021), Edinburgh (056), Fairfield (026), Hagood (086), Homestead (052), Kings Grant (047), Kingston (007), Lake Christopher (089), Lake Joyce (090), Lake Smith (019), Larkspur (024), Lexington (091), Little Neck (092), Malibu (014), Manor (068), Mt. Trashmore (013), Newtown (093), Ocean Park (017), Old Donation (015), Pembroke (039), Pleasant Hill (079), Point O’ View (022), Providence (027), Reon (080), Shannon (053), Shell (069), Shelton Park (059), Sherry Park (057), Stratford Chase (051), Tallwood (084), Thalia (028), Thoroughgood (018), Village (076), Windsor Oaks (036), and Witchduck (038) Precincts and part of the Chesapeake Beach (037) Precinct.Eighth. Part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of the Alanton (006), Brookwood (077), Buckner (074), Cape Henry (011), Capps Shop (033), Colony (075), Corporate Landing (070), Courthouse (035), Culver (063), Dahlia (073), Eastern Shore (067), Foxfire (060), Great Neck (010), Green Run (046), Holland (029), Hunt (066), Landstown (062), Linkhorn (004), London Bridge (008), Lynnhaven (049), Magic Hollow (055), North Beach (001), Ocean Lakes (003), Oceana (050), Pinewood (094), Plaza (012), Redwing (030), Rock Lake (081), Rudee (072), Seatack (005), Shelbourne (082), Sigma (031), South Beach (002), Strawbridge (083), Timberlake (045), Trantwood (009), Upton (085), and Wolfsnare (048) Precincts.Ninth. All of Charles City County; part of Hanover County comprised of the Ashland (101), Elmont (704), and Stony Run (207) Precincts and part of the Wilmington Parish (203) Precinct; part of Henrico County comprised of the Adams (201), Antioch (501), Azalea (202), Canterbury (205), Cedar Fork (502), Central Gardens (206), Chamberlayne (207), Chickahominy (503), Donahoe (504), Dorey (505), Eanes (506), Elko (507), Fairfield (208), Glen Lea (209), Greenwood (210), Highland Gardens (211), Highland Springs (508), Hungary (213), Hunton (108), Laburnum (509), Longdale (214), Maplewood (215), Masonic (510), Mehfoud (511), Montrose (512), Mountain (217), Nine Mile (513), Pleasants (514), Randolph (219), Ratcliffe (220), Rolfe (519), Sandston (515), Sullivans (516), Town Hall (517), Whitlocks (518), Wilder (222), and Yellow Tavern (223) Precincts and parts of the Hermitage (106) and Staples Mill (113) Precincts; and part of the City of Richmond comprised of the 105 (105), 206 (206), 207 (207), 208 (208), 212 (212), 213 (213), 301 (301), 302 (302), 303 (303), 304 (304), 305 (305), 306 (306), 308 (308), 501 (501), 504 (504), 602 (602), 603 (603), 604 (604), 606 (606), and 607 (607) Precincts and parts of the 104 (104), 106 (106), and 307 (307) Precincts.Tenth. All of Powhatan County; part of Chesterfield County comprised of the Beaufont (513), Belgrade (508), Belmont (206), Black Heath (511), Bon Air (505), Brandermill (403), Cranbeck (509), Crestwood (502), Davis (515), Evergreen (312), Greenfield (506), Huguenot (501), Midlothian (503), Reams (408), Robious (504), Salisbury (507), Swift Creek (411), Tomahawk (310), Watkins (514), and Woolridge (313) Precincts and part of the Chippenham (207) Precinct; and part of the City of Richmond comprised of the 101 (101), 102 (102), 111 (111), 112 (112), 113 (113), 114 (114), 203 (203), 204 (204), 211 (211), 309 (309), 402 (402), 404 (404), 409 (409), 410 (410), 412 (412), 413 (413), 503 (503), 505 (505), 508 (508), 903 (903), 908 (908), 909 (909), 910 (910), and 911 (911) Precincts and parts of the 104 (104), 106 (106), and 307 (307) Precincts.Eleventh. All of Amelia County; all of the City of Colonial Heights; and part of Chesterfield County comprised of the Bailey Bridge (315), Beach (305), Beulah (202), Bird (203), Birkdale (317), Cosby (307), Crenshaw (414), Deer Run (302), Ecoff (108), Falling Creek (205), Five Forks (210), Gates (201), Genito (402), Harbour Pointe (401), Iron Bridge (111), Jacobs (204), La Prade (405), Manchester (409), Meadowbrook (208), Monacan (407), Nash (211), North Chester (104), Providence (404), S. Manchester (308), Salem Church (209), Shenandoah (413), Skinquarter (309), Smoketree (406), South Chester (102), Southside (213), Spring Run (316), St. Lukes (212), Sycamore (510), Wagstaff (410), Wells (107), Winfrees Store (304), and Winterpock (306) Precincts and part of the Chippenham (207) Precinct.Twelfth. Part of Hanover County comprised of the Farrington (701), Montpelier (702), and Rockville (703) Precincts and part of the Wilmington Parish (203) Precinct; and part of Henrico County comprised of the Belmont (203), Brookland (204), Byrd (401), Causeway (301), Cedarfield (302), Coalpit (101), Crestview (303), Derbyshire (402), Dumbarton (102), Freeman (403), Gayton (404), Glen Allen (103), Glenside (104), Godwin (405), Greendale (105), Hilliard (107), Hollybrook (212), Hungary Creek (116), Innsbrook (304), Jackson Davis (305), Johnson (109), Lakeside (110), Lakewood (406), Lauderdale (407), Longan (111), Maude Trevvett (112), Maybeury (408), Monument Hills (306), Moody (216), Mooreland (409), Nuckols Farm (307), Oakview (218), Pemberton (410), Pinchbeck (411), Pocahontas (308), Ridge (309), Ridgefield (412), Rivers Edge (317), Rollingwood (413), Sadler (310), Shady Grove (311), Short Pump (318), Skipwith (312), Spottswood (414), Springfield (313), Stoney Run (314), Stratford Hall (221), Summit Court (114), Three Chopt (315), Tuckahoe (415), Tucker (316), Wellborne (417), West End (416), and Westwood (115) Precincts and parts of the Hermitage (106) and Staples Mill (113) Precincts.Thirteenth. Part of Loudoun County comprised of the Ashburn Farm (102), Between The Hills (306), Cedar Lane (810), Clarkes Gap (409), Dominion (811), East Lovettsville (411), Evergreen (408), Freedom (112), Hamilton (304), Heritage (412), Hillsboro (303), Hillside (105), Hutchison (109), Little River (107), Lucketts (403), Mercer (108), Newton-Lee (814), Philomont (305), Pinebrook (115), Purcellville One (301), Purcellville Two (310), Round Hill (302), Russell Branch (809), Sanders Corner (101), Stone Bridge (808), Waterford (402), West Lovettsville (401), and Woodgrove (311) Precincts and parts of the Briar Woods (111), Cool Spring (505), Dulles South (114), Eagle Ridge (106), and Weller (816) Precincts; and part of Prince William County comprised of the Battlefield (402), Bristow Run (111), Bull Run (403), Glenkirk (408), Limestone (113), Mullen (411), and Pace West (412) Precincts and parts of the Buckland Mills (110), Evergreen (401), Marsteller (107), Sinclair (404), Sudley North (409), and Victory (108) Precincts.Fourteenth. Part of Isle of Wight County comprised of the Carrsville (503), Walters (501), and Zuni (504) Precincts and part of the Windsor (402) Precinct; part of Southampton County comprised of the Berlin (101), Hunterdale (501), Ivor (102), and Sedley (602) Precincts; part of the City of Chesapeake comprised of the Bailey Creek (038), Bells Mill (009), Bells Mill II (046), Bethel (002), Bridgetown (037), Churchland (004), Coopers Way (051), Deep Creek (006), E. W. Chittum School (020), Fellowship (021), Grassfield (014), Great Bridge (001), Great Bridge Baptist Church (036), Green Sea (047), Greenbrier (007), Hickory Grove (016), Hickory Middle School (034), Indian Creek (017), John T. West (041), Jolliff One (019), Lake Drummond (039), Pleasant Crossing (043), Shipyard Road (052), Sunray I (028), and Waterway (049) Precincts and parts of the Oak Grove (023), Silverwood (027), and Sunray II (045) Precincts; part of the City of Franklin comprised of the Precinct

1-1

(101) and Precinct

2-1

(201) Precincts; part of the City of Portsmouth comprised of the Twenty-Nine (029), Thirty (030), Thirty-Two (032), and Thirty-Three (033) Precincts; part of the City of Suffolk comprised of the Airport (401), Cypress Chapel (303), Holland (502), Holy Neck (503), Kilby’s Mill (501), Lake Cohoon (504), Lakeside (601), and Whaleyville (402) Precincts and parts of the Elephants Fork/Westhaven (603) and King’s Fork (203) Precincts; and part of the City of Virginia Beach comprised of the Bellamy (043), Blackwater (034), Creeds (032), Cromwell (054), Glenwood (058), Hillcrest (087), Indian Lakes (078), North Landing (088), Rosemont Forest (064), and Round Hill (071) Precincts.Fifteenth. All of Charlotte, Lunenburg, Mecklenburg, and Nottoway Counties; part of Brunswick County comprised of the Alberta (301), Broadnax (101), Danieltown (302), Elmore (303), King’s Store (402), Rock Store (103), Seymour (304), Sturgeon (401), and Tillman (102) Precincts; part of Campbell County comprised of the Brookneal (701), Gladys (702), Morris Church (703), and Three Forks (401) Precincts; part of Dinwiddie County comprised of the Cherry Hill (403), Church Road (103), Courthouse (501), Dinwiddie (401), Little Zion (402), McKenney (502), Reams (301), Rocky Run (503), and White Oak (102) Precincts and part of the New Hope (302) Precinct; part of Halifax County comprised of the Center (403), Clover (203), Crossroads (202), Dan River (502), Hyco (701), Midway (702), Scottsburg (503), and Virgilina (703) Precincts and parts of the Black Walnut (601), Clays Mill (201), and South Boston East (801) Precincts; part of Pittsylvania County comprised of the Bearskin (602), Callands (201), Dry Fork (607), Hurt (501), Motley Sycamore (502), Mt. Cross (705), Mt. Hermon (704), Sandy Level (204), Stony Mill (603), Swansonville (604), Tunstall (106), Twin Springs (103), West Blairs (108), and Whitmell (605) Precincts and parts of the Bachelors Hall (702), Central (301), Climax (206), East Blairs (307), East Gretna (309), Gretna (207), Keeling (402), Kentuck (404), Renan (503), Riceville (305), and Ringgold (405) Precincts; part of Prince George County comprised of the Blackwater (202), Bland (201), Brandon (203), Harrison (105), Richard Bland (101), and Templeton (102) Precincts; and part of the City of Danville comprised of the Ward Sixteen (016) and Ward Seventeen (017) Precincts.Sixteenth. All of the Cities of Hopewell and Petersburg; part of Chesterfield County comprised of the Bellwood (101), Carver (112), Drewry’s Bluff (105), Dutch Gap (110), Elizabeth Scott (109), Enon (103), Ettrick (301), Harrowgate (106), and Matoaca (303) Precincts; part of Dinwiddie County comprised of the Chesdin (202), Edgehill (201), and Rohoic (101) Precincts and part of the New Hope (302) Precinct; part of Prince George County comprised of the Courts Bldg (204), Jefferson Park (205), Rives (104), and Union Branch (103) Precincts; and part of the City of Richmond comprised of the 509 (509), 510 (510), 609 (609), 610 (610), 701 (701), 702 (702), 703 (703), 705 (705), 706 (706), 707 (707), 802 (802), 806 (806), 810 (810), 811 (811), 812 (812), 814 (814), and 902 (902) Precincts.Seventeenth. All of Orange County; all of the City of Fredericksburg; part of Albemarle County comprised of the Agnor-Hurt (104), Branchlands (103), Dunlora (105), Free Bridge (504), Georgetown (203), and Keswick (501) Precincts and parts of the Jack Jouett (201), Stony Point (502), and Woodbrook (101) Precincts; part of Culpeper County comprised of the East Fairfax (201), Mitchells (601), Pearl Sample (602), and West Fairfax (101) Precincts; part of Louisa County comprised of the Cuckoo (502), Fredericks Hall (501), Louisa #1 (201), Louisa #2 (202), Mechanicsville (102), Mineral (401), Patrick Henry #1 (301), Yanceyville (402), and Zion (101) Precincts; and part of Spotsylvania County comprised of the Battlefield (701), Belmont (501), Brent’s Mill (702), Brokenburg (502), Chancellor (204), Courthouse (504), Fairview (703), Frazers Gate (402), Hazel Run (302), Ni River (203), Piedmont (603), Salem (601), Smith Station (602), and Todd’s Tavern (503) Precincts and parts of the Brock (505) and Plank Road (301) Precincts.Eighteenth. All of Greensville and Sussex Counties; all of the City of Emporia; part of Brunswick County comprised of the Dromgoole (201), Edgerton (202), Fitzhugh (203), and Lawrenceville (501) Precincts; part of Isle of Wight County comprised of the Camps Mill (502), Courthouse (401), Orbit (403), Pons (302), and Raynor (505) Precincts and part of the Windsor (402) Precinct; part of Southampton County comprised of the Blackwater River (701), Boykins (201), Branchville (202), Capron (301), Courtland (601), Drewryville (401), Forks-Of-The-River (502), Meherrin (203), Newsoms (702), and Sebrell (302) Precincts; part of Surry County comprised of the Carsley (401), Claremont (501), Dendron (301), Spring Grove (502), Surry (101), and Wall’s Bridge (302) Precincts and part of the Bacon’s Castle (201) Precinct; part of the City of Chesapeake comprised of the Nansemond (044) and Taylor Road (035) Precincts and part of the Silverwood (027) Precinct; part of the City of Franklin comprised of the Precinct

3-1

(301), Precinct

4-1

(401), Precinct

5-1

(501), and Precinct

6-1

(601) Precincts; part of the City of Portsmouth comprised of the One (001), Five (005), Seven (007), Nine (009), Ten (010), Eleven (011), Thirteen (013), Fourteen (014), Sixteen (016), Seventeen (017), Nineteen (019), Twenty (020), Twenty-One (021), Twenty-Two (022), Twenty-Three (023), Twenty-Four (024), Twenty-Five (025), Twenty-Six (026), Twenty-Seven (027), Twenty-Eight (028), Thirty-One (031), Thirty-Four (034), Thirty-Five (035), and Thirty-Six (036) Precincts and part of the Thirty-Eight (038) Precinct; and part of the City of Suffolk comprised of the Bennetts Creek (104), Chuckatuck (202), Hollywood (701), John F. Kennedy (302), Nansemond River (703), Olde Towne (602), Southside (403), White Marsh (301), and Yeates (705) Precincts and parts of the Elephants Fork/Westhaven (603), and King’s Fork (203) Precincts.Nineteenth. All of Floyd County; all of the City of Salem; part of Bedford County comprised of the Bethesda Methodist Church (303), Huddleston Elem School (305), and Saunders Vol Fire Dept (205) Precincts; part of Carroll County comprised of the Dugspur (303), Gladeville (502), Hillsville C (301), Laurel (504), Sylvatus (302), Vaughn (501), and Woodlawn E (503) Precincts and parts of the Hillsville B (201) and Woodlawn D (402) Precincts; part of Franklin County comprised of the Bonbrook (602), Boones Mill (601), Bowmans (503), Burnt Chimney (102), Callaway (502), Cooper’s Cove (603), Dudley (204), Endicott (403), Ferrum (402), Gogginsville (504), and Scruggs (103) Precincts and parts of the Glade Hill (201), Henry (401), Hodgesville (203), Penhook (202), Rocky Mount East (701), Rocky Mount South (703), Rocky Mount West (702), and Waidsboro (501) Precincts; part of Montgomery County comprised of the C-1 (301), C-2 (302), D-1 (401), D-2 (402), D-3 Part 1 (403), and D-4 (404) Precincts and parts of the B-1 (201), B-3 (203), B-4 (204), C-3 (303), C-4 (304), and D-5 (405) Precincts; part of Roanoke County comprised of the Bent Mountain (301), Bonsack (402), Castle Rock (305), Cave Spring (503), Clearbrook (505), Cotton Hill (501), Glenvar (103), Green Hill (106), Hunting Hills (507), Lindenwood (405), Mason Valley (102), Mount Pleasant (406), North Vinton (403), Oak Grove (304), Penn Forest (502), Peters Creek (105), Poages Mill (302), South Vinton (404), Wildwood (108), and Windsor Hills (303) Precincts and part of the Northside (104) Precinct; and part of Wythe County comprised of the East Wytheville (303), Fort Chiswell (401), Huddle (601), Jackson Memorial (501), Max Meadows (402), and Sheffey (502) Precincts.Twentieth. All of Henry and Patrick Counties; all of the Cities of Galax and Martinsville; part of Carroll County comprised of the Fancy Gap (404), Gladesboro (203), Hillsville D (401), Lambsburg (103), Laurel Fork (202), Mount Bethel (101), Oakland A (104), Oakland D (403), and St. Paul (102) Precincts and parts of the Hillsville B (201) and Woodlawn D (402) Precincts; part of Franklin County comprised of the Dickinson (304), Fork Mountain (302), Snow Creek (301), and Sontag (303) Precincts and parts of the Glade Hill (201), Henry (401), Hodgesville (203), Penhook (202), Rocky Mount East (701), Rocky Mount South (703), Rocky Mount West (702), and Waidsboro (501) Precincts; part of Halifax County comprised of the Childrey (101), Courthouse (401), Liberty (102), Meadville (302), Mt. Carmel (603), Republican Grove (103), Sinai (305), South Boston West (802), Union (605), and Vernon Hill (304) Precincts and parts of the Black Walnut (601), Clays Mill (201), and South Boston East (801) Precincts; part of Pittsylvania County comprised of the Brosville (606), Chatham (105), Ferry Road (703), and Mt. Airy (308) Precincts and parts of the Bachelors Hall (702), Central (301), Climax (206), East Blairs (307), East Gretna (309), Gretna (207), Keeling (402), Kentuck (404), Renan (503), Riceville (305), and Ringgold (405) Precincts; and part of the City of Danville comprised of the Ward One (001), Ward Two (002), Ward Three (003), Ward Four (004), Ward Five (005), Ward Six (006), Ward Seven (007), Ward Eight (008), Ward Nine (009), Ward Ten (010), Ward Eleven (011), Ward Twelve (012), Ward Thirteen (013), Ward Fourteen (014), and Ward Fifteen (015) Precincts.Twenty-first. All of Giles County; all of the City of Roanoke; part of Montgomery County comprised of the A-1 (101), A-2 (102), A-3 (103), B-2 (202), E-1 (501), E-2 (502), F-1 (601), F-2 (602), G-1 (701), and G-2 (702) Precincts and parts of the B-1 (201), B-3 (203), B-4 (204), C-3 (303), C-4 (304), and D-5 (405) Precincts; and part of Roanoke County comprised of the Bennett Springs (107), Botetourt Springs (204), Burlington (202), Catawba (101), Garst Mill (306), Mount Vernon (506), and Ogden (504) Precincts and part of the Northside (104) Precinct.Twenty-second. All of Amherst, Appomattox, Buckingham, Cumberland, Fluvanna, Goochland, and Prince Edward Counties; part of Louisa County comprised of the Bumpass (601), Locust Creek (602), Sheltons Mill (701), and South Anna (702) Precincts; and part of the City of Lynchburg comprised of the First Ward Second Precinct (102), First Ward Third Precinct (103), First Ward Fourth Precinct (104), First Ward Fifth Precinct (105), Second Ward First Precinct (201), Second Ward Second Precinct (202), Second Ward Third Precinct (203), Third Ward First Precinct (301), Third Ward Second Precinct (302), Fourth Ward Second Precinct (402), and Fourth Ward Third Precinct (403) Precincts and part of the First Ward First Precinct (101) Precinct.Twenty-third. All of Botetourt and Craig Counties; all of the City of Bedford; part of Bedford County comprised of the Bedford Christian Church (703), Bedford County PSA (302), Big Island Elem School (502), Body Camp Elem School (204), Boonsboro Elem School (505), Boonsboro Ruritan Club (506), Chamblissburg First Aid Bldg (103), Forest Elem School (401), Forest Youth Athletic Assoc. (304), Goode Rescue Squad (701), Goodview Elem School (101), Hardy Fire & Rescue Bldg (102), Knights of Columbus Bldg (403), Liberty High School (702), Moneta Elem School (203), Montvale Elem School (601), New London Academy (301), Odd Fellows Hall (504), Pleasant View (507), Saunders Grove Brethren Church (604), Sedalia Center (503), Shady Grove Baptist Church (602), Staunton River High School (202), Suck Springs (704), Thaxton Elem School (603), and Thomas Jefferson Elem School (402) Precincts; part of Campbell County comprised of the Airport (601), Altavista (303), Bedford Springs (202), Brookville (101), Concord (603), Court House (402), Evington (301), Kings (602), Lynch Station (302), New London (102), Spring Hill (501), Walker (201), and Yellow Branch (502) Precincts; part of Roanoke County comprised of the Hollins (206), Mountain View (203), Orchards (205), and Plantation (201) Precincts; and part of the City of Lynchburg comprised of the Third Ward Third Precinct (303), Third Ward Fourth Precinct (304), Third Ward Fifth Precinct (305), Fourth Ward First Precinct (401), and Fourth Ward Fourth Precinct (404) Precincts and part of the First Ward First Precinct (101) Precinct.Twenty-fourth. All of Augusta, Greene, and Madison Counties; all of the Cities of Staunton and Waynesboro; part of Culpeper County comprised of the Brown’s Store (402), Cardova (303), Eggbornsville (302), Eldorado (401), Lignum (703), Richardsville (704), and Rixeyville (502) Precincts and part of the Brandy Station (702) Precinct; and part of Rockingham County comprised of the Cross Keys (306), Elkton (501), Grottoes (304), Keezletown (301), Massanetta Springs (305), McGaheysville (503), Montezuma (402), Mt. Crawford (403), North River (303), Port Republic (302), South Fork (504), Stony Run (505), and Swift Run (502) Precincts.Twenty-fifth. All of Alleghany, Bath, Highland, Nelson, and Rockbridge Counties; all of the Cities of Buena Vista, Charlottesville, Covington, and Lexington; and part of Albemarle County comprised of the Belfield (204), Brownsville (604), Burnley (505), Cale (405), Country Green (305), Crozet (601), Earlysville (603), East Ivy (304), Free Union (602), Hollymead (503), Ivy (301), Monticello (402), Northside (106), Porter’s (403), Red Hill (302), Scottsville (401), Stone Robinson (406), University Hall (202), and Yellow Mountain (605) Precincts and parts of the Jack Jouett (201), Stony Point (502), and Woodbrook (101) Precincts.Twenty-sixth. All of Page, Rappahannock, Shenandoah, and Warren Counties; all of the City of Harrisonburg; and part of Rockingham County comprised of the Bergton (104), Bridgewater (401), Broadway (101), Dayton (404), Edom (202), Fulks Run (103), Lacey Spring (105), Melrose (203), Mt. Clinton (204), Ottobine (207), Plains (107), Silver Lake (405), Singers Glen (201), Tenth Legion (106), and Timberville (102) Precincts.Twenty-seventh. All of Clarke, Fauquier, and Frederick Counties; all of the City of Winchester; part of Culpeper County comprised of the Jeffersonton (501) Precinct and part of the Brandy Station (702) Precinct; part of Loudoun County comprised of the Aldie (309), Middleburg (307), and St. Louis (308) Precincts; and part of Stafford County comprised of the Hartwood (101) Precinct and part of the Ruby (203) Precinct.Twenty-eighth. Part of King George County comprised of the Dahlgren (301), James Monroe (201), and Passapatanzy (102) Precincts and parts of the Courthouse (101) and Shiloh (401) Precincts; part of Prince William County comprised of the Alvey (406), Brentsville (101), Marshall (202), Mountain View (410), and Park (109) Precincts and parts of the Bennett (102), Benton (203), Buckland Mills (110), Cedar Point (112), Evergreen (401), Forest Park (310), Nokesville (104), and Woodbine (209) Precincts; part of Spotsylvania County comprised of the Elys Ford (201), Grange Hall (303), and Wilderness (202) Precincts and parts of the Brock (505) and Plank Road (301) Precincts; part of Stafford County comprised of the Aquia (401), Brooke (403), Chatham (602), Courthouse (402), Drew (503), Falmouth (502), Ferry Farm (601), Gayle (504), Grafton (501), Hampton (703), Harbor (303), Ramoth (104), Rocky Run (102), Roseville (202), Simpson (103), Stefaniga (204), White Oak (603), Whitson (702), and Woodlands (701) Precincts and parts of the Rock Hill (201), Ruby (203), and Widewater (302) Precincts; and part of Westmoreland County comprised of the Precinct

3-1

(301), Precinct

4-1

(401), and Precinct

5-1
